Utah statutes.
41-6a-1113.   Bicycle -- Prohibited equipment -- Brakes required.
(1)  A bicycle may not be equipped with, and a person may not use on a
bicycle, a siren or whistle.
(2)  Every bicycle shall be equipped with a brake or brakes which enable its
driver to stop the bicycle within 25 feet from a speed of 10 miles per hour on
dry, level, clean pavement.
